Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Chapter 70. Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children.
“ARTICLE VII. PLACING AGENCY RESPONSIBILITY

“(G) Each member state shall provide for coordination among its branches of government concerning the state’s participation in, and compliance with, the compact and Interstate Commission activities, through the creation of an advisory council or use of an existing body or board.

“ARTICLE VII. PLACING AGENCY RESPONSIBILITY

“(H) Each member state shall establish a central state compact office, which shall be responsible for state compliance with the compact and the rules of the Interstate Commission.

“ARTICLE VII. PLACING AGENCY RESPONSIBILITY

“(I) The public child-placing agency in the sending state shall oversee compliance with the provisions of the Indian Child Welfare Act (25 USC 1901 et seq.) for placements subject to the provisions of this compact, prior to placement.

“ARTICLE VII. PLACING AGENCY RESPONSIBILITY

“(J) With the consent of the Interstate Commission, states may enter into limited agreements that facilitate the timely assessment and provision of services and supervision of placements under this compact.

“ARTICLE VIII. INTERSTATE COMMISSION FOR THE PLACEMENT OF CHILDREN

“ARTICLE VIII. INTERSTATE COMMISSION FOR THE PLACEMENT OF CHILDREN

“The member states hereby establish, by way of this compact, a commission known as the “Interstate Commission for the Placement of Children.” The activities of the Interstate Commission are the formation of public policy and are a discretionary state function. The Interstate Commission shall:

“ARTICLE VIII. INTERSTATE COMMISSION FOR THE PLACEMENT OF CHILDREN

“(A) Be a joint commission of the member states and shall have the responsibilities, powers and duties set forth herein, and such additional powers as may be conferred upon it by subsequent concurrent action of the respective legislatures of the member states.

“ARTICLE VIII. INTERSTATE COMMISSION FOR THE PLACEMENT OF CHILDREN

“(B) Consist of one commissioner from each member state who shall be appointed by the executive head of the state human services administration with ultimate responsibility for the child welfare program. The appointed commissioner shall have the legal authority to vote on policy related matters governed by this compact binding the state.

“ARTICLE VIII. INTERSTATE COMMISSION FOR THE PLACEMENT OF CHILDREN

“(1) Each member state represented at a meeting of the Interstate Commission is entitled to one vote.

“ARTICLE VIII. INTERSTATE COMMISSION FOR THE PLACEMENT OF CHILDREN

“(2) A majority of the member states shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business, unless a larger quorum is required by the bylaws of the Interstate Commission.

“ARTICLE VIII. INTERSTATE COMMISSION FOR THE PLACEMENT OF CHILDREN

“(3) A representative shall not delegate a vote to another member state.

“ARTICLE VIII. INTERSTATE COMMISSION FOR THE PLACEMENT OF CHILDREN

“(4) A representative may delegate voting authority to another person from their state for a specified meeting.

“ARTICLE VIII. INTERSTATE COMMISSION FOR THE PLACEMENT OF CHILDREN

“(C) In addition to the commissioners of each member state, the Interstate Commission shall include persons who are members of interested organizations as defined in the bylaws or rules of the Interstate Commission. Such members shall be ex officio and shall not be entitled to vote on any matter before the Interstate Commission.

“ARTICLE VIII. INTERSTATE COMMISSION FOR THE PLACEMENT OF CHILDREN

“(D) Establish an executive committee which shall have the authority to administer the day-to-day operations and administration of the Interstate Commission. It shall not have the power to engage in rulemaking.

“ARTICLE IX. POWERS AND DUTIES OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“ARTICLE IX. POWERS AND DUTIES OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“The Interstate Commission shall have the following powers:

“ARTICLE IX. POWERS AND DUTIES OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(A) To promulgate rules and take all necessary actions to effect the goals, purposes and obligations as enumerated in this compact.

“ARTICLE IX. POWERS AND DUTIES OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(B) To provide for dispute resolution among member states.

“ARTICLE IX. POWERS AND DUTIES OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(C) To issue, upon request of a member state, advisory opinions concerning the meaning or interpretation of the interstate compact, its bylaws, rules or actions.

“ARTICLE IX. POWERS AND DUTIES OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(D) To enforce compliance with this compact or the bylaws or rules of the Interstate Commission pursuant to Article XII.

“ARTICLE IX. POWERS AND DUTIES OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(E) Collect standardized data concerning the interstate placement of children subject to this compact as directed through its rules which shall specify the data to be collected, the means of collection and data exchange and reporting requirements.

“ARTICLE IX. POWERS AND DUTIES OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(F) To establish and maintain offices as may be necessary for the transacting of its business.

“ARTICLE IX. POWERS AND DUTIES OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(G) To purchase and maintain insurance and bonds.

“ARTICLE IX. POWERS AND DUTIES OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(H) To hire or contract for services of personnel or consultants as necessary to carry out its functions under the compact and establish personnel qualification policies, and rates of compensation.

“ARTICLE IX. POWERS AND DUTIES OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(I) To establish and appoint committees and officers including, but not limited to, an executive committee as required by Article X.

“ARTICLE IX. POWERS AND DUTIES OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(J) To accept any and all donations and grants of money, equipment, supplies, materials, and services, and to receive, utilize, and dispose thereof.

“ARTICLE IX. POWERS AND DUTIES OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(K) To lease, purchase, accept contributions or donations of, or otherwise to own, hold, improve or use any property, real, personal, or mixed.

“ARTICLE IX. POWERS AND DUTIES OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(L) To sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon, or otherwise dispose of any property, real, personal or mixed.

“ARTICLE IX. POWERS AND DUTIES OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(M) To establish a budget and make expenditures.

“ARTICLE IX. POWERS AND DUTIES OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(N) To adopt a seal and bylaws governing the management and operation of the Interstate Commission.

“ARTICLE IX. POWERS AND DUTIES OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(O) To report annually to the legislatures, governors, the judiciary, and state advisory councils of the member states concerning the activities of the Interstate Commission during the preceding year. Such reports shall also include any recommendations that may have been adopted by the Interstate Commission.

“ARTICLE IX. POWERS AND DUTIES OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(P) To coordinate and provide education, training and public awareness regarding the interstate movement of children for officials involved in such activity.

“ARTICLE IX. POWERS AND DUTIES OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(Q) To maintain books and records in accordance with the bylaws of the Interstate Commission.

“ARTICLE IX. POWERS AND DUTIES OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(R) To perform such functions as may be necessary or appropriate to achieve the purposes of this compact.

“ARTICLE X. ORGANIZATION AND OPERATION OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“ARTICLE X. ORGANIZATION AND OPERATION OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(A) Bylaws

“ARTICLE X. ORGANIZATION AND OPERATION OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(1) Within 12 months after the first Interstate Commission meeting, the Interstate Commission shall adopt bylaws to govern its conduct as may be necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes of the compact.

“ARTICLE X. ORGANIZATION AND OPERATION OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(2) The Interstate Commission’s bylaws and rules shall establish conditions and procedures under which the Interstate Commission shall make its information and official records available to the public for inspection or copying. The Interstate Commission may exempt from disclosure information or official records to the extent they would adversely affect personal privacy rights or proprietary interests.

“ARTICLE X. ORGANIZATION AND OPERATION OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(B) Meetings

“ARTICLE X. ORGANIZATION AND OPERATION OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(1) The Interstate Commission shall meet at least once each calendar year. The chairperson may call additional meetings and, upon the request of a simple majority of the member states shall call additional meetings.

“ARTICLE X. ORGANIZATION AND OPERATION OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(2) Public notice shall be given by the Interstate Commission of all meetings and all meetings shall be open to the public, except as set forth in the rules or as otherwise provided in the compact. The Interstate Commission and its committees may close a meeting, or portion thereof, where it determines by two-thirds vote that an open meeting would be likely to:

“ARTICLE X. ORGANIZATION AND OPERATION OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(a) relate solely to the Interstate Commission’s internal personnel practices and procedures; or

“ARTICLE X. ORGANIZATION AND OPERATION OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(b) disclose matters specifically exempted from disclosure by federal law; or

“ARTICLE X. ORGANIZATION AND OPERATION OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(c) disclose financial or commercial information which is privileged, proprietary or confidential in nature; or

“ARTICLE X. ORGANIZATION AND OPERATION OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(d) involve accusing a person of a crime, or formally censuring a person; or

“ARTICLE X. ORGANIZATION AND OPERATION OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(e) disclose information of a personal nature where disclosure would constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy or physically endanger one or more persons; or

“ARTICLE X. ORGANIZATION AND OPERATION OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(f) disclose investigative records compiled for law enforcement purposes; or

“ARTICLE X. ORGANIZATION AND OPERATION OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(g) specifically relate to the Interstate Commission’s participation in a civil action or other legal proceeding.

“ARTICLE X. ORGANIZATION AND OPERATION OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(3) For a meeting, or portion of a meeting, closed pursuant to this provision, the Interstate Commission’s legal counsel or designee shall certify that the meeting may be closed and shall reference each relevant exemption provision. The Interstate Commission shall keep minutes which shall fully and clearly describe all matters discussed in a meeting and shall provide a full and accurate summary of actions taken, and the reasons therefore, including a description of the views expressed and the record of a roll call vote. All documents considered in connection with an action shall be identified in such minutes. All minutes and documents of a closed meeting shall remain under seal, subject to release by a majority vote of the Interstate Commission or by court order.

“ARTICLE X. ORGANIZATION AND OPERATION OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(4) The bylaws may provide for meetings of the Interstate Commission to be conducted by telecommunication or other electronic communication.

“ARTICLE X. ORGANIZATION AND OPERATION OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(C) Officers and Staff

“ARTICLE X. ORGANIZATION AND OPERATION OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(1) The Interstate Commission may, through its executive committee, appoint or retain a staff director for such period, upon such terms and conditions and for such compensation as the Interstate Commission may deem appropriate. The staff director shall serve as secretary to the Interstate Commission, but shall not have a vote. The staff director may hire and supervise such other staff as may be authorized by the Interstate Commission.

“ARTICLE X. ORGANIZATION AND OPERATION OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(2) The Interstate Commission shall elect, from among its members, a chairperson and a vice chairperson of the executive committee and other necessary officers, each of whom shall have such authority and duties as may be specified in the bylaws.

“ARTICLE X. ORGANIZATION AND OPERATION OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(D) Qualified Immunity, Defense and Indemnification

“ARTICLE X. ORGANIZATION AND OPERATION OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(1) The Interstate Commission’s staff director and its employees shall be immune from suit and liability, either personally or in their official capacity, for a claim for damage to or loss of property or personal injury or other civil liability caused or arising out of or relating to an actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred, or that such person had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities; provided, that such person shall not be protected from suit or liability for damage, loss, injury, or liability caused by a criminal act or the intentional or willful and wanton misconduct of such person.

“ARTICLE X. ORGANIZATION AND OPERATION OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(a) The liability of the Interstate Commission’s staff director and employees or Interstate Commission representatives, acting within the scope of such person’s employment or duties for acts, errors, or omissions occurring within such person’s state may not exceed the limits of liability set forth under the Constitution and laws of that state for state officials, employees, and agents. The Interstate Commission is considered to be an instrumentality of the states for the purposes of any such action. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to protect such person from suit or liability for damage, loss, injury, or liability caused by a criminal act or the intentional or willful and wanton misconduct of such person.

“ARTICLE X. ORGANIZATION AND OPERATION OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(b) The Interstate Commission shall defend the staff director and its employees and, subject to the approval of the Attorney General or other appropriate legal counsel of the member state shall defend the commissioner of a member state in a civil action seeking to impose liability arising out of an actual or alleged act, error or omission that occurred within the scope of Interstate Commission employment, duties or responsibilities, or that the defendant had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of Interstate Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not result from intentional or willful and wanton misconduct on the part of such person.

“ARTICLE X. ORGANIZATION AND OPERATION OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(c) To the extent not covered by the state involved, member state, or the Interstate Commission, the representatives or employees of the Interstate Commission shall be held harmless in the amount of a settlement or judgment, including attorney’s fees and costs, obtained against such persons arising out of an actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred within the scope of Interstate Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or that such persons had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of Interstate Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not result from intentional or willful and wanton misconduct on the part of such persons.

“ARTICLE XI. RULEMAKING FUNCTIONS OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“ARTICLE XI. RULEMAKING FUNCTIONS OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(A) The Interstate Commission shall promulgate and publish rules in order to effectively and efficiently achieve the purposes of the compact.

“ARTICLE XI. RULEMAKING FUNCTIONS OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(B) Rulemaking shall occur pursuant to the criteria set forth in this article and the bylaws and rules adopted pursuant thereto. Such rulemaking shall substantially conform to the principles of the “Model State Administrative Procedures Act,” 1981 Act, Uniform Laws Annotated, Vol. 15, p.1 (2000), or such other administrative procedure acts as the Interstate Commission deems appropriate consistent with due process requirements under the United States Constitution as now or hereafter interpreted by the U. S. Supreme Court. All rules and amendments shall become binding as of the date specified, as published with the final version of the rule as approved by the Interstate Commission.

“ARTICLE XI. RULEMAKING FUNCTIONS OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(C) When promulgating a rule, the Interstate Commission shall, at a minimum:

“ARTICLE XI. RULEMAKING FUNCTIONS OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(1) Publish the proposed rule’s entire text stating the reason(s) for that proposed rule; and

“ARTICLE XI. RULEMAKING FUNCTIONS OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(2) Allow and invite any and all persons to submit written data, facts, opinions and arguments, which information shall be added to the record, and be made publicly available; and

“ARTICLE XI. RULEMAKING FUNCTIONS OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(3) Promulgate a final rule and its effective date, if appropriate, based on input from state or local officials, or interested parties.

“ARTICLE XI. RULEMAKING FUNCTIONS OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(D) Rules promulgated by the Interstate Commission shall have the force and effect of administrative regulations and shall be binding in the compacting states to the extent of and in the manner provided for in this compact.

“ARTICLE XI. RULEMAKING FUNCTIONS OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(E) Not later than 60 days after a rule is promulgated, an interested person may file a petition in the U.S. District Court for the District of Columbia or in the Federal District Court where the Interstate Commission’s principal office is located for judicial review of such rule. If the court finds that the Interstate Commission’s action is not supported by substantial evidence in the rulemaking record, the court shall hold the rule unlawful and set it aside.

“ARTICLE XI. RULEMAKING FUNCTIONS OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(F) If a majority of the legislatures of the member states rejects a rule, those states may by enactment of a statute or resolution in the same manner used to adopt the compact cause that such rule shall have no further force and effect in any member state.

“ARTICLE XI. RULEMAKING FUNCTIONS OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(G) The existing rules governing the operation of the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children superseded by this act shall be null and void no less than 12, but no more than 24 months after the first meeting of the Interstate Commission created hereunder, as determined by the members during the first meeting.

“ARTICLE XI. RULEMAKING FUNCTIONS OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(H) Within the first 12 months of operation, the Interstate Commission shall promulgate rules addressing the following:

“ARTICLE XI. RULEMAKING FUNCTIONS OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(1) Transition rules

“ARTICLE XI. RULEMAKING FUNCTIONS OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(2) Forms and procedures

“ARTICLE XI. RULEMAKING FUNCTIONS OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(3) Time lines

“ARTICLE XI. RULEMAKING FUNCTIONS OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(4) Data collection and reporting

“ARTICLE XI. RULEMAKING FUNCTIONS OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(5) Rulemaking

“ARTICLE XI. RULEMAKING FUNCTIONS OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(6) Visitation

“ARTICLE XI. RULEMAKING FUNCTIONS OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(7) Progress reports/supervision

“ARTICLE XI. RULEMAKING FUNCTIONS OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(8) Sharing of information/confidentiality

“ARTICLE XI. RULEMAKING FUNCTIONS OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(9) Financing of the Interstate Commission

“ARTICLE XI. RULEMAKING FUNCTIONS OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(10) Mediation, arbitration and dispute resolution

“ARTICLE XI. RULEMAKING FUNCTIONS OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(11) Education, training and technical assistance

“ARTICLE XI. RULEMAKING FUNCTIONS OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(12) Enforcement

“ARTICLE XI. RULEMAKING FUNCTIONS OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(13) Coordination with other interstate compacts

“ARTICLE XI. RULEMAKING FUNCTIONS OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(I) Upon determination by a majority of the members of the Interstate Commission that an emergency exists:

“ARTICLE XI. RULEMAKING FUNCTIONS OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(1) The Interstate Commission may promulgate an emergency rule only if it is required to:

“ARTICLE XI. RULEMAKING FUNCTIONS OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(a) Protect the children covered by this compact from an imminent threat to their health, safety and well-being; or

“ARTICLE XI. RULEMAKING FUNCTIONS OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(b) Prevent loss of federal or state funds; or

“ARTICLE XI. RULEMAKING FUNCTIONS OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(c) Meet a deadline for the promulgation of an administrative rule required by federal law.

“ARTICLE XI. RULEMAKING FUNCTIONS OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(2) An emergency rule shall become effective immediately upon adoption, provided that the usual rulemaking procedures provided hereunder shall be retroactively applied to said rule as soon as reasonably possible, but no later than 90 days after the effective date of the emergency rule.

“ARTICLE XI. RULEMAKING FUNCTIONS OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

“(3) An emergency rule shall be promulgated as provided for in the rules of the Interstate Commission.

“ARTICLE XII. OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION, ENFORCEMENT

“ARTICLE XII. OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION, ENFORCEMENT

“(A) Oversight

“ARTICLE XII. OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION, ENFORCEMENT

“(1) The Interstate Commission shall oversee the administration and operation of the compact.

“ARTICLE XII. OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION, ENFORCEMENT

“(2) The executive, legislative and judicial branches of state government in each member state shall enforce this compact and the rules of the Interstate Commission and shall take all actions necessary and appropriate to effectuate the compact’s purposes and intent. The compact and its rules shall be binding in the compacting states to the extent of and in the manner provided for in this compact.

“ARTICLE XII. OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION, ENFORCEMENT

“(3) All courts shall take judicial notice of the compact and the rules in any judicial or administrative proceeding in a member state pertaining to the subject matter of this compact.

“ARTICLE XII. OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION, ENFORCEMENT

“(4) The Interstate Commission shall be entitled to receive service of process in any action in which the validity of a compact provision or rule is the issue for which a judicial determination has been sought and shall have standing to intervene in any proceedings. Failure to provide service of process to the Interstate Commission shall render any judgment, order or other determination, however so captioned or classified, void as to the Interstate Commission, this compact, its bylaws or rules of the Interstate Commission.

“ARTICLE XII. OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION, ENFORCEMENT

“(B) Dispute Resolution

“ARTICLE XII. OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION, ENFORCEMENT

“(1) The Interstate Commission shall attempt, upon the request of a member state, to resolve disputes which are subject to the compact and which may arise among member states and between member and non-member states.

“ARTICLE XII. OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION, ENFORCEMENT

“(2) The Interstate Commission shall promulgate a rule providing for both mediation and binding dispute resolution for disputes among compacting states. The costs of such mediation or dispute resolution shall be the responsibility of the parties to the dispute.

“ARTICLE XII. OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION, ENFORCEMENT

“(C) Enforcement

“ARTICLE XII. OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION, ENFORCEMENT

“(1) If the Interstate Commission determines that a member state has defaulted in the performance of its obligations or responsibilities under this compact, its bylaws or rules, the Interstate Commission may:

“ARTICLE XII. OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION, ENFORCEMENT

“(a) Provide remedial training and specific technical assistance; or

“ARTICLE XII. OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION, ENFORCEMENT

“(b) Provide written notice to the defaulting state and other member states, of the nature of the default and the means of curing the default. The Interstate Commission shall specify the conditions by which the defaulting state must cure its default; or

“ARTICLE XII. OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION, ENFORCEMENT

“(c) By majority vote of the members, initiate against a defaulting member state legal action in the United States District Court for the District of Columbia or, at the discretion of the Interstate Commission, in the federal district where the Interstate Commission has its principal office, to enforce compliance with the provisions of the compact, its bylaws or rules. The relief sought may include both injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial enforcement is necessary the prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation including reasonable attorney’s fees; or

“ARTICLE XII. OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION, ENFORCEMENT

“(d) Avail itself of any other remedies available under state law or the regulation of official or professional conduct.

“ARTICLE XIII. FINANCING OF THE COMMISSION

“ARTICLE XIII. FINANCING OF THE COMMISSION

“(A) The Interstate Commission shall pay, or provide for the payment of the reasonable expenses of its establishment, organization and ongoing activities.

“ARTICLE XIII. FINANCING OF THE COMMISSION

“(B) The Interstate Commission may levy on and collect an annual assessment from each member state to cover the cost of the operations and activities of the Interstate Commission and its staff which must be in a total amount sufficient to cover the Interstate Commission’s annual budget as approved by its members each year. The aggregate annual assessment amount shall be allocated based upon a formula to be determined by the Interstate Commission which shall promulgate a rule binding upon all member states.

“ARTICLE XIII. FINANCING OF THE COMMISSION

“(C) The Interstate Commission shall not incur obligations of any kind prior to securing the funds adequate to meet the same; nor shall the Interstate Commission pledge the credit of any of the member states, except by and with the authority of the member state.

“ARTICLE XIII. FINANCING OF THE COMMISSION

“(D) The Interstate Commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts and disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the Interstate Commission shall be subject to the audit and accounting procedures established under its bylaws. However, all receipts and disbursements of funds handled by the Interstate Commission shall be audited yearly by a certified or licensed public accountant and the report of the audit shall be included in and become part of the annual report of the Interstate Commission.

“ARTICLE XIV. MEMBER STATES, EFFECTIVE DATE AND AMENDMENT

“ARTICLE XIV. MEMBER STATES, EFFECTIVE DATE AND AMENDMENT

“(A) Any state is eligible to become a member state.

“ARTICLE XIV. MEMBER STATES, EFFECTIVE DATE AND AMENDMENT

“(B) The compact shall become effective and binding upon legislative enactment of the compact into law by no less than 35 states. Thereafter it shall become effective and binding as to any other member state upon enactment of the compact into law by that state. The executive heads of the state human services administration with ultimate responsibility for the child welfare program of non-member states or their designees shall be invited to participate in the activities of the Interstate Commission on a non-voting basis prior to adoption of the compact by all states.

“ARTICLE XIV. MEMBER STATES, EFFECTIVE DATE AND AMENDMENT

“(C) The Interstate Commission may propose amendments to the compact for enactment by the member states. No amendment shall become effective and binding on the member states unless and until it is enacted into law by unanimous consent of the member states.

“ARTICLE XV. WITHDRAWAL AND DISSOLUTION

“ARTICLE XV. WITHDRAWAL AND DISSOLUTION

“(A) Withdrawal

“ARTICLE XV. WITHDRAWAL AND DISSOLUTION

“(1) Once effective, the compact shall continue in force and remain binding upon each and every member state; provided that a member state may withdraw from the compact specifically repealing the statute which enacted the compact into law.

“ARTICLE XV. WITHDRAWAL AND DISSOLUTION

“(2) Withdrawal from this compact shall be by the enactment of a statute repealing the same. The effective date of withdrawal shall be the effective date of the repeal of the statute.

“ARTICLE XV. WITHDRAWAL AND DISSOLUTION

“(3) The withdrawing state shall immediately notify the president of the Interstate Commission in writing upon the introduction of legislation repealing this compact in the withdrawing state. The Interstate Commission shall then notify the other member states of the withdrawing state’s intent to withdraw.

“ARTICLE XV. WITHDRAWAL AND DISSOLUTION

“(4) The withdrawing state is responsible for all assessments, obligations and liabilities incurred through the effective date of withdrawal.

“ARTICLE XV. WITHDRAWAL AND DISSOLUTION

“(5) Reinstatement following withdrawal of a member state shall occur upon the withdrawing state reenacting the compact or upon such later date as determined by the members of the Interstate Commission.

“ARTICLE XV. WITHDRAWAL AND DISSOLUTION

“(B) Dissolution of Compact

“ARTICLE XV. WITHDRAWAL AND DISSOLUTION

“(1) This compact shall dissolve effective upon the date of the withdrawal or default of the member state which reduces the membership in the compact to one member state.

“ARTICLE XV. WITHDRAWAL AND DISSOLUTION

“(2) Upon the dissolution of this compact, the compact becomes null and void and shall be of no further force or effect, and the business and affairs of the Interstate Commission shall be concluded and surplus funds shall be distributed in accordance with the bylaws.

“ARTICLE XVI. SEVERABILITY AND CONSTRUCTION

“ARTICLE XVI. SEVERABILITY AND CONSTRUCTION

“(A) The provisions of this compact shall be severable, and if any phrase, clause, sentence or provision is deemed unenforceable, the remaining provisions of the compact shall be enforceable.

“ARTICLE XVI. SEVERABILITY AND CONSTRUCTION

“(B) The provisions of this compact shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.

“ARTICLE XVI. SEVERABILITY AND CONSTRUCTION

“(C) Nothing in this compact shall be construed to prohibit the concurrent applicability of other interstate compacts to which the states are members.

“ARTICLE XVII. BINDING EFFECT OF COMPACT AND OTHER LAWS

“ARTICLE XVII. BINDING EFFECT OF COMPACT AND OTHER LAWS

“(A) Other Laws

“ARTICLE XVII. BINDING EFFECT OF COMPACT AND OTHER LAWS

“(1) Nothing herein prevents the enforcement of any other law of a member state that is not inconsistent with this compact.

“ARTICLE XVII. BINDING EFFECT OF COMPACT AND OTHER LAWS

“(2) All member states’ laws conflicting with this compact or its rules are superseded to the extent of the conflict.

“ARTICLE XVII. BINDING EFFECT OF COMPACT AND OTHER LAWS

“(B) Binding Effect of the Compact

“ARTICLE XVII. BINDING EFFECT OF COMPACT AND OTHER LAWS

“(1) All lawful actions of the Interstate Commission, including all rules and bylaws promulgated by the Interstate Commission, are binding upon the member states.

“ARTICLE XVII. BINDING EFFECT OF COMPACT AND OTHER LAWS

“(2) All agreements between the Interstate Commission and the member states are binding in accordance with their terms.

“ARTICLE XVII. BINDING EFFECT OF COMPACT AND OTHER LAWS

“(3) In the event any provision of this compact exceeds the constitutional limits imposed on the legislature of any member state, such provision shall be ineffective to the extent of the conflict with the constitutional provision in question in that member state.

“ARTICLE XVIII. INDIAN TRIBES

“Notwithstanding any other provision in this compact, the Interstate Commission may promulgate guidelines to permit Indian tribes to utilize the compact to achieve any or all of the purposes of the compact as specified in Article I. The Interstate Commission shall make reasonable efforts to consult with Indian tribes in promulgating guidelines to reflect the diverse circumstances of the various Indian tribes.”

Cross references. —

For effect of the 2008 reenactment of Article XII(A)(4) of this section on Rules 4 and 24(b), Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure, see § 9, ch. 93, SLA 2008, in the 2008 Temporary and Special Acts.